Utah statutes.
17-27a-609.   Land use authority approval of vacation or amendment of plat -- Recording the amended plat.

(1)  The land use authority may approve the vacation or amendment of a plat by signing an amended plat showing the vacation or amendment if the land use authority finds that:

(a)  there is good cause for the vacation or amendment; and

(b)  no public street, right-of-way, or easement has been vacated or amended.

(2)  The land use authority shall ensure that the amended plat showing the vacation or amendment is recorded in the office of the county recorder in which the land is located.

(3)  A legislative body may vacate a subdivision or a portion of a subdivision by recording in the county recorder's office an ordinance describing the subdivision or the portion being vacated.

(4)  An amended plat may not be submitted to the county recorder for recording unless it is signed, acknowledged, and dedicated by each owner of record of the portion of the plat that is amended.

(5)  A management committee may sign and dedicate an amended plat as provided in Title 57, Chapter 8, Condominium Ownership Act.

(6)  A plat may be corrected as provided in Section 57-3-106.

